Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-747
Recognition of order modified in another state; enforcement.

If a child support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state, upon request, except as otherwise provided in the act:

(1) may enforce its order that was modified only as to arrearages and interest accruing before the modification;

(2) may provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

(3) shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 47;

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 83.